North Carolina, session 2025, SB182.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. The sum of twenty-two million dollars ($22,000,000) in nonrecurring
funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year is appropriated from the General Fund to the City of Conover
for water or wastewater system improvements.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*S182-v-1*